tests/хуняҫа.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах хуняҫа":
    хуняҫа<n><nom> :  хуняҫа 
    хуняҫа<n><px1sg><nom> :  хуняҫам 
    хуняҫа<n><px2sg><nom> :  хуняҫу 
    хуняҫа<n><px3sp><nom> :  хуняшшӗ 
    хуняҫа<n><px1pl><nom> :  хуняҫамӑр 
    хуняҫа<n><px2pl><nom> :  хуняҫӑр 
